Colorado statutes. TITLE 30 Government - County
ARTICLE 24
COUNTY AGRICULTURAL RESEARCH

Section

30-24-101. Legislative declaration.

Agricultural crop and livestock producers are constantly faced with the problem of new insects, diseases, depletion of soil fertility, lack of information as to market demands and preferences, and of other distributive practices. Some counties have need for more research work than others. Such counties, if placed in a position to provide for agricultural research work with laboratory facilities, management, and some labor, would be able to cooperate with the technical personnel of the state and federal research agencies and better meet these local demands for research work.

Source:

L. 41:

p. 88, § 1.

CSA:

C. 5, § 105.

CRS 53:

§ 6-6-1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 6-6-1.

30-24-102. Authority of county commissioners.

For the purposes set forth in this article, the boards of county commissioners of the several counties of the state are authorized to:

Purchase or rent land for use in county agricultural research work;

Purchase or rent laboratory facilities for use in county agricultural research work;

Purchase or rent laboratory equipment and supplies for use in county agricultural research work;

Employ such management and common labor as they consider necessary to provide for the proper efficiency of the county agricultural research work;

Make provision for a county agricultural research advisory committee, to serve without compensation, composed of members representing the different agricultural groups in the county and elected by such agricultural groups under such procedure and policy as the board of county commissioners may determine;

Enter into cooperative agreements with the boards of county commissioners of other counties to economically carry out the purposes of this article;

Enter into cooperative agreements with the board of governors of the Colorado state university system for the assistance of Colorado state university, including all of its agencies, in the developing and financing of the projects to be included in the operations of the county agricultural research work each year;

Enter into cooperative agreements through Colorado state university with the proper federal research agencies.

Source:

L. 41:

p. 88, § 2.

CSA:

C. 5, § 106.

CRS 53:

§ 6-6-2.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 6-6-2.

L. 2002:

(1)(g) amended, p. 1247, § 22, effective August 7.

30-24-103. Appropriation.

The boards of county commissioners of the several counties are authorized to appropriate from the county general fund such money as may be necessary to pay the obligations for county agricultural extension and research work as may be authorized.

Source:

L. 41:

p. 89, § 3.

CSA:

C. 5, § 107.

L. 51:

p. 296, § 7.

CRS 53:

§ 6-6-3.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 6-6-3.

30-24-104. County agricultural fund.

The boards of county commissioners of the several counties are authorized to establish a county agricultural fund. This fund may be created out of the county general fund, and repayment of this fund may be made through a county agricultural research tax levy.

Source:

L. 41:

p. 89, § 4.

CSA:

C. 5, § 108.

CRS 53:

§ 6-6-4.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 6-6-4.